As early as 1920-1921, certain circles belonging to the effete bourgeois 
class accused our Movement again and again of taking up a negative attitude 
towards the modern State. 


For that reason the motley gang of camp-followers attached to the 
various political parties, representing a heterogeneous conglomeration of 
political views, assumed the right of utilising all available means to suppress 
the protagonists of this young Movement which, was preaching a new political 
gospel. 


Our opponents deliberately ignored the fact that the bourgeois class itself 
stood for no uniform opinion as to what the State really meant and that the 
bourgeoisie did not and could not give any uniform definition of this institution. 


Those whose duty it is to explain what is meant when we speak of the 
State hold chairs in state universities, often in the department of constitutional 
law, and consider it their highest duty to find explanations and justifications for 
the more or less fortunate existence of that particular form of State which 
provides them with their daily bread. 


The more absurd such a form of State is, the more obscure, artificial and 
incomprehensible are the definitions which are advanced to explain the 
purpose of its existence. 


What, for instance, could a professor at a royal and imperial university 
write about the meaning and purpose of a State in a country whose constitution 
represented the greatest monstrosity of the twentieth century? 


That would be a difficult undertaking indeed, in view of the fact that the 
contemporary professor of constitutional law is obliged not so much to serve 
the cause of truth as to serve a definite purpose, and this purpose is to defend 
at all costs the existence of that monstrous human mechanism which we now 
call the State. 


Nobody need be surprised if concrete facts are evaded as far as, 
possible when the problem of the State is under discussion and if professors 
adopt the tactics of concealing themselves in a morass of abstract values, 


433 


duties and purposes which are described as ‘ethical’ and ‘moral.’ Generally 
speaking, these various theorists may be classed, in three groups: 


1. Those who held that the State is a more or less voluntary association 
of men under governmental authority. 


This is numerically the largest group. In its ranks are to be found those 
who worship our present principle of legalized authority. 


In their eyes the will of the people plays no part whatever in the whole 
affair. For them, the fact that the State exists 1s sufficient reason to consider it 
sacred and inviolable. 


In order to champion this aberration of the human brain one would have 
to have a sort of canine adoration for what is called the authority of the State. 


In the minds of these people the means is quickly and easily substituted 
for the end. The State no longer exists for the purpose of serving men, but men 
exist for the purpose of revering the authority of the State, which is vested in 
its functionaries, even down to the most inferior official. 


In order to prevent this placid and ecstatic adoration from changing into 
something that might become in any way disturbing, the authority of the State is 
limited simply to the task of preserving law and order. 


Thus it is no longer either a means or an end. The State must see that how 
and order are preserved and, in their turn, law and order must make the 
existence of the State possible. 


All life must move between these two poles. In Bavaria, this view is 
upheld by the artful politicians of the Bavarian Centre, which 1s called the 
‘Bavarian People’s Party.’ 


In Austria, the black-and-yellow Legitimists adopt a similar attitude. 


In the Reich, unfortunately, the so-called conservative elements often 
hold the same view. 


2. The second group is numerically somewhat smaller. 


It includes those who would make the existence of the State dependent on 
certain conditions. They insist that not only should there be a uniform system of 
government, but also, if possible, uniformity of language, if only for technical 


434 


reasons of administration. 


The authority of the State is no longer, the sole and exclusive end for 
which the State exists, but it must also promote the good of its subjects. 


Ideas of ‘freedom,’ mostly, based on a misunderstanding of the meaning 
of that word, enter into the concept of the State as it exists in the minds of this 


group. 


The form of government is no longer considered inviolable simply 
because it exists. It must submit to the test of practical efficiency. 


Its venerable age no longer protects it from criticism in the light of 
modern exigencies. Moreover, in their view, the first duty laid upon the State is 
to guarantee the economic well-being of the individual citizen. 


Hence it is judged from the practical standpoint and according to general 
principles based on the idea of economic returns. 


The chief representatives of this theory of the State are to be found 
among the average German bourgeoisie, especially our liberal democrats. 


3. The third group is numerically the smallest. In the State they see a 
means for the realisation of aims (generally vague in conception) dictated by a 
policy of power, on the part of a united people speaking the same language. 


They want a common language not only because they hope that thereby 
the State will be furnished with a solid basis for the extension of its power 
beyond its own frontiers, but also because they think—though falling into a 
fundamental error by so doing—that such a common language would facilitate 
the carrying out of a definite process of nationalisation. 


During the last century it was lamentable for those who had to witness it, 
to notice how in these circles I have just mentioned the word ‘Germanisation’ 
was frivolously played with, though often with the very best of intentions. 


I well remember how, in the days of my youth, this very term used to 
give rise to notions which were false to an incredible degree. Even in Pan- 
German circles one heard the opinion expressed that the Austrian Germans 
might very well succeed in Germanising the Austrian Slavs, if only the 
government were ready to co-operate. 


Those people did not understand that a policy of Germanisation can be 


435 


carried out only as regards territory and not as regards human beings. 


What was generally understood by this term was the enforced adoption 
of the German language, but it is almost inconceivable that people should 
imagine that a Negro or a Chinaman, for example, can become German simply 
by learning the German language, by being willing to speak it for the rest of 
their lives and even to vote in favour of some German political party. 


Our bourgeois nationalists could never clearly see that such a process of 
Germanisation is in reality de-Germanisation, for even if all the outstanding 
and, visible differences between the various peoples could be bridged over 
and finally eliminated by the use of a common language, this would give rise to 
a process of bastardisation which in this case would not signify 
Germanisation, but the annihilation of the German element. 


In the course of history it has happened only too often that a conquering 
race succeeded by force in compelling the people whom they had subjected to 
speak their tongue, with the result that after a thousand years their language 
was spoken by another people and thus the conqueror finally turned out to be 
the conquered. 


What makes a people or, to be more correct, a race, is not language but 
blood. It would therefore be justifiable to speak of Germanisation only if that 
process could change the blood of the people who were subjected to it, which 
is obviously impossible. 


A change would be possible only by a mixture of blood, but in this case 
the quality of the superior race would be debased. The final result of such a 
mixture would be that precisely those qualities were destroyed which had 
enabled the conquering race to achieve victory over an inferior people. 


It is especially cultural creative ability which disappears when a 
superior race intermixes with an inferior one, even though all the resultant 
mongrel race speaks the language of the race that had once been superior. 


For a certain time there will be a conflict between the different 
mentalities and it may be that a nation which is ina state of progressive 
degeneration will at the last moment rally its cultural creative powers and once 
again produce striking cultural masterpieces. 


These are, however, produced only by individuals belonging to the 
superior race or by hybrids of the first crossing, in whom the superior blood 


436 


has remained dominant and seeks to assert itself, but never by the last 
descendants of such hybrids. 


These are always in a state of cultural retrogression. We must consider it 
fortunate that a Germanisation of Austria according to the plan of Joseph II did 
not succeed. 


Probably the result would have been that the Austrian State would have 
survived, but at the same time the use of a common language would have 
debased the racial quality of the German element. 


In the course of centuries a certain herd instinct might have been 
developed, but the herd itself would have deteriorated in quality. It is possible 
that a constitutional State would have been established, but a culturally 
creative people would have been lost to the world. 


For the German nation it was better that this process of intermixture did 
not take place, although it was not renounced for any high-minded reasons, but 
simply through the short-sighted pettiness of the Habsburgs. 


If it had taken place, the German people could now scarcely be looked 
upon as a cultural factor. 


Not only in Austria, however, but also in Germany, these so-called 
national circles were, and still are, under the influence of similar erroneous 
ideas. 


The much favoured policy with regard to Poland which provided for the 
Germanisation of the eastern provinces was, unfortunately, practically always 
based on the same false reasoning. 


Here again it was believed that the Polish people could be Germanised 
by being compelled to use the German language. The result would have been 
fatal, for people of an alien race by expressing their alien ideas in the German 
language would have debased the dignity and nobility of our nation by their 
own inferiority. 


It is revolting to think how much damage is indirectly done to German 
prestige to-day owing to the fact that the German patois of Jews entering the 
United States enables them to be classed as Germans, because of the ignorance 
of Americans with regard to things German. Here nobody would dream of 
accepting the fact that these lousy emigrants from the East generally speak 


437 


German as proof of their German origin and nationality. What has been 
beneficially Germanised in the course of history was the land which our 
ancestors conquered with the sword and colonised with German tillers of the 
soil. 


Inasmuch as they introduced foreign blood into our national body in 
carrying out this colonisation, they helped to bring about the lamentable 
disintegration of our racial character, a process which has resulted in our 
German hyper-individualism, though this latter characteristic 1s, unfortunately, 
frequently praised even now. 


In the third group also, there are people who, to a certain degree, 
consider the State as an end in itself. Hence they consider its preservation as 
one of the highest aims of human existence. 


Summing up, we arrive at the following conclusion: A common feature 
of all these views is, that they are not grounded on a recognition of the 
profound truth that the capacity for creating cultural values is essentially based 
on the racial element. 


In accordance with this fact, the paramount purpose of the State to 
preserve and improve the race, an indispensable condition of all progress in 
human civilisation. 


Thus the Jew, Karl Marx, was able to utilise and exploit these false 
concepts and ideas on the nature and purpose of the State. 


By eliminating from the concept of the State all thought of the obligation 
which the State has towards the race, without finding any other formula that 
might be universally accepted, the bourgeois teaching prepared the way for that 
doctrine which rejects the State as such. 


That is why the bourgeois struggle against Marxian internationalism is 
doomed to fail in this particular. The bourgeois classes have already sacrificed 
the basic principles which alone could furnish a solid footing for their ideas. 


Their crafty opponent has perceived the defects in their structure and 
advances to the assault with those weapons which they themselves have 
unwittingly placed in his hands. 


Therefore any new movement which is based on the volkisch 
Weltanschauung will first of all have to put forward a clear and logical 


438 


definition of the nature and purpose of the State. 


The fundamental principle is that the State is not an end in itself, but the 
means to an end. It is the preliminary condition for the development of a higher 
form of human civilisation, but not the reason for such a development, for 
which a culturally creative race is alone responsible. 


There may be hundreds of excellent States on this earth and yet if the 
Aryan, who is the creator and custodian of civilisation, should disappear, all 
culture corresponding to the spiritual needs of the superior nations to-day 
would also disappear. We may go still further and say that the fact that States 
have been created by human beings does not exclude the possibility that the 
human race may become extinct, if the superior intellectual faculties and 
powers of adaptation were to be lost because the race possessing these 
faculties and powers had disappeared. 


If, for instance, the surface of the globe were to be shaken to-day by 
some seismic convulsion and if new Himalayas were to emerge from the 
waves of the sea, this one catastrophe alone might annihilate human 
civilisation. 


No State could continue to exist. All order would be shattered, and all 
vestiges of cultural products which had been evolved in the course of 
thousands of years would disappear. 


Nothing would be left but one tremendous field of death and destruction 
submerged in floods of water and mud. If; however, only a few people were to 
survive this terrible havoc, and if these people belonged to a definite race that 
had the innate power to build up a civilisation, when the commotion had 
passed, the earth would again bear witness to the creative power of the human 
spirit, even though a span of a thousand years might intervene. 


Only with the extermination of the last race that possesses the gift of 
cultural creativeness, and indeed only if all the individuals of that race also 
disappeared, would the earth definitely be turned into a desert. 


On the other hand, modem history furnishes examples to show that States 
which are of racial origin cannot, if the representatives of that race lack 
creative genius, preserve them from disaster and destruction. 


Just as many varieties of prehistoric animals had to give way to others 
and leave no trace behind them, so man will also have to give way, if he loses 


439 


that definite intellectual faculty which enables him to find the weapons that are 
necessary for him to preserve his own existence. 


It is not the State as such that brings about a certain definite advance in 
cultural progress. The State can only protect the race that is the cause of such 
progress. 


The State as such may well exist without undergoing any change for 
hundreds of years, though the cultural faculties and the general life of the 
people, which is shaped by these faculties, may have suffered profound 
changes, by reason of the fact that the State did not prevent a mixing of races 
from taking place. 


The present State, for instance, may continue to exist in a mere 
mechanical form, but the poison of miscegenation permeating the national body 
is bringing about a cultural decadence which is already manifesting itself in 
various symptoms of a detrimental character. 


Thus the indispensable prerequisite for the existence of a superior type 
of human beings is not the State, but the race, which is alone capable of 
producing that higher type. 


This capacity is always there, though it will lie dormant unless external 
circumstances awaken it to action. Nations, or rather races, which are 
endowed with the faculty of cultural creativeness possess this faculty ina 
latent form during periods when external circumstances are unfavourable for 
the time being. They therefore do not allow the faculty to express itself 
effectively. 


It is, therefore, outrageously unjust to speak of the pre-Christian Germans 
as uncivilised barbarians, for such they never were. 


But the severity of the climate that prevailed in the northern regions 
which they inhabited, imposed conditions of life which hampered a free 
development of their creative faculties. 


If they had come to the fairer climate of the South, with no previous 
culture whatsoever, and if they had acquired the necessary human material— 
that 1s to say, men of an inferior race—to serve them as tools in performing 
necessary labours, the cultural faculty dormant in them would have blossomed 
forth in splendour as happened in the case of the Greeks, for example. 


440 


But this primordial creative faculty in cultural things was not solely due 
to their northern climate. Neither the Laplanders nor the Eskimos would have 
become creators of a culture if they had been transplanted to the South. 


This wonderful creative faculty is a special gift bestowed on the Aryan, 
whether it lies dormant in him or becomes active, according as adverse 
conditions and surroundings prevent the active expression of that faculty or 
favourable circumstances permit it. 


From these facts the following conclusions may be drawn: The State is 
only a means to an end. 


Its end and its purpose are to preserve and promote a community of 
human beings who are physically as well as spiritually kindred. 


Above all, it must preserve the existence of the race, thereby providing 
the indispensable condition for the free development of all the forces dormant 
in this race. 


A great part of these faculties will always have to be employed in the 
first place to preserve the physical existence of the race, and only the 
remaining portion will be free to work in the field of intellectual progress. 


But, as a matter of fact, the one is always, the fundamental prerequisite 
for the other. 


Those States which do not serve this purpose have no justification for 
their existence. They are monstrosities. 


The fact that they do exist is no more of a justification than the successful 
raids carried out by a band of pirates can be considered a justification of 
piracy. 


We National Socialists, who are fighting for a new Weltanschauung, 
must never take our stand on the famous ‘basis of facts’, if these be mistaken 
facts. If we did so, we should cease to be the protagonists of a new and great 
idea and would become slaves in the service of the fallacy which is dominant 
to-day. 


We must make a clear-cut distinction between the vessel and its contents. 
The State is only the vessel and the race is what it contains. 


The vessel can have significance only if it preserves and safeguards the 


441 


contents. Otherwise it is worthless. 


Hence, the supreme purpose of the volkisch State is to guard and 
preserve those racial elements which, through their work in the cultural field, 
create that beauty and dignity which are characteristic of a higher mankind. 


As Aryans, we can consider the State only as the living organism of a 
people, an organism which does not merely preserve the existence of a people, 
but functions in such a way as to lead that people to a position of supreme 
liberty by the progressive development of its intellectual and cultural faculties. 


What they want to impose upon us as a State to-day is, in most cases, 
nothing but a monstrosity, the product of a profound human abet ration which 
brings untold suffering in its train. 


We National Socialists know that in holding these views we are taking 
up a revolutionary stand in the world of to-day and that we are branded as 
revolutionaries. 


Despite this, our views and our conduct will not be determined by the 
approbation or disapprobation of our contemporaries, but only by our duty in 
following a truth which we have acknowledged. 


In doing this we, have reason to believe that posterity will have a clearer 
insight and will not only understand the work we are doing to-day, but will 
also ratify it as the right work and will extol it accordingly. 


On these principles, we National Socialists base our standards of value 
in appraising a State. This value will be relative when viewed from the 
particular standpoint of the individual nation, but it will be absolute, when 
considered from the standpoint of humanity as a whole. 


In other words; this means that the excellence of a State can never be 
judged by the level of its culture or the degree of importance which the outside 
world attaches to its power, but that its excellence must be judged by the 
degree to which its constitution serves the race in question. 


A State may be considered as a model example if it adequately serves 
not only the vital needs of the race it represents, but if by its very existence it 
actually ensures the preservation of this same race, no matter what general 
cultural significance this constitution may have within the framework of the 
world. 


442 


For it is not the task of the State to create human capabilities, but only to 
assure free scope for the exercise of capabilities that already exist. 


On the other hand, a State may be called bad if} in spite of the existence 
of a high cultural level, it dooms to destruction the representatives of that 
culture by breaking up their racial compositeness. For the practical effect of 
such a policy would be to destroy those conditions that are indispensable for 
the ulterior existence of that culture, which the State did not create, but which 
is the fruit of the creative power inherent in the race whose existence is 
assured by being united in the living organism of the State. 


Once again, let me emphasise the fact that the State itself is not the 
substance but the form. Therefore, the cultural level of a people is not the 
standard by which we can judge the value of the State in which that people 
lives. 


It is evident that a people endowed with high creative powers in the 
cultural sphere is of more worth than a tribe of Negroes, and yet the 
constitutional organism of the former, if judged from the standpoint of 
efficiency, may be worse than that of the Negroes. 


Not even the best of States and state institutions can cultivate in a people 
faculties which they lack and which they never possessed, but a bad State may 
gradually destroy the faculties which once existed. 


This it can do by allowing or favouring the suppression of those who are 
the champions of a racial culture. 


The worth of a State can, therefore, be determined only by asking how 
far it actually succeeds in promoting the well-being of a definite race and not 
by the role which it plays in the world at large. 


Its relative worth can be estimated readily and accurately, but it is 
difficult to judge its absolute worth, because the latter is conditioned not only 
by the State, but also by the quality and cultural level of the people that belong 
to the individual State in question. 


Therefore, when we speak of the high mission of the State we must not 
forget that the high mission belongs to the people and that the business of the 
State is to use its organising powers for the purpose of furnishing the necessary 
conditions which allow this people freely to develop its creative faculties. 


443 


Again, if we ask what kind of constitution we Germans need, we must 
first have a clear notion as to the people which it is destined to embrace and 
what purpose it must serve. 


Unfortunately, German national life is not based on a uniform racial 
nucleus,. The process of welding the original elements together has not gone so 
far as to warrant us in saying that a new race has emerged. 


On the contrary, the poison which has invaded the national body, 
especially since the Thirty Years’ War, has destroyed the uniform constitution 
not only of our blood, but also of our national soul. The open frontiers of our 
native country, the association with non-German foreign elements in the 
territories that lie all along those frontiers, and especially the strong influx of 
foreign blood into the interior of the Reich itself, has prevented any complete 
assimilation of those various elements, because the influx has continued 
steadily. 


Out of this melting-pot no new race has arisen. The heterogeneous 
elements continue to exist side by side, and the result is that, especially in 
times of crisis, when the herd usually flocks together, the Germans disperse in 
all directions. 


The fundamental racial elements are not only different in different 
districts, but there are also various elements within these various districts. 


Beside the Nordic type we find the East-European type, beside the 
Eastern there is the Dinaric, the Western type intermingling with both, and 
hybrids among them all. That is a grave drawback to us. 


Through it the Germans lack that strong herd instinct which arises from 
unity of blood and saves nations from ruin in dangerous and critical times, 
because on such occasions small differences disappear, and a united herd faces 
the enemy. 


What we understand by the word hyper-individualism is explained by 
the fact that our primordial racial elements have existed side by side without 
ever consolidating. 


In times of peace such a situation may offer some advantages but taken 
all in all, it has prevented us from becoming the masters of the world. 


If, in its historical development, the German people had possessed that 


444 


united herd instinct by which other peoples have so much benefited, then the 
German Reich would probably be mistress of the globe to-day. 


World history would have taken another course and no man can tell if 
what many benighted pacifists hope to attain by petitioning, whining and 
crying, might not have been achieved in this way, namely, a peace which would 
not be based upon the waving of olive branches and tearful misery-mongering 
of pacifist old women, but a peace guaranteed by the triumphant sword of a 
people endowed with the power to master the world and administer it in the 
service of a higher civilisation. 


The fact that our people were not a national entity based on unity of 
blood has been the source of untold misery for us. 


To many petty German potentates it gave residential capital cities; but the 
German people as a whole was deprived of its right to rulership. 


Even to-day our nation still suffers from this lack of inner unity, but what 
has been the cause of our past and present misfortunes may turn out a blessing 
for us in the future. 


Though on the one hand it may be a drawback that our racial elements 
were not welded together, so that no homogeneous national body could 
develop, on the other hand, it was fortunate that, since at least a part of our best 
blood was thus kept pure, its racial quality was not debased. A complete 
assimilation of all our racial elements would certainly have brought about a 
homogeneous national organism, but, as has been proved in the case of every 
racial mixture, it would have been less capable of creating a civilisation than 
would its best original elements. 


One benefit resulting from the fact that there was no all-round 
assimilation is the fact that even now we have large groups of German Nordic 
people within our national organism, and that their blood has not been mixed 
with the blood of other races. 


We must look upon this as our most valuable asset for the sake of the 
future. 


During that dark period of absolute ignorance in regard to all racial 
laws, when each individual was considered to be ona par with every other, 
there could be no clear appreciation of the difference between the various 
fundamental racial characteristics. 


445 


We know to-day that a complete assimilation of all the various elements 
which constitute the nation might have resulted in giving us a larger share of 
external power. 


On the other hand, the highest of human aims would not have been 
attained, because the only kind of people, which Fate has obviously chosen to 
bring about this perfection, would have been lost in the general mixture of 
races which would have resulted from such a racial amalgamation. 


Nevertheless, what has been prevented by a friendly Destiny, without 
any assistance on our part, must now be reconsidered and utilised in the light 
of our new knowledge. 


He who talks of the German people as having a mission to fulfil on this 
earth must know that this mission cannot be fulfilled except by the building up 
of a State whose highest purpose is to preserve and promote those nobler 
elements of our race, and of the whole of mankind, which have remained 
unimpaired. 


Thus, for the first time a high inner purpose is accredited to the State. In 
contrast to the ridiculous thesis that the State should do no more than act as the 
guardian of public law and order, so that everybody can peacefully dupe 
everybody else, it is given a very high mission indeed in preserving and 
encouraging the highest types of humanity which a beneficent Creator has 
bestowed on this earth. 


Out of a dead mechanism which claims to be an end in itself a living 
organism shall arise which has to serve one purpose exclusively, and that a 
purpose which belongs to a higher order of ideas. 


As a State, the German Reich shall include all Germans, Its task 1s not 
only to gather in and foster the most valuable sections of our people, but to 
lead them slowly and surely to a dominant position in the world. 


Thus a period of stagnation is superseded by a period of effort. And 
here, and in every other sphere, the proverb holds good, that to rest is to rust, 
and furthermore the proverb, that victory will always be won by him who 
attacks. 


The higher the final goal which we strive to reach, and the less it be 
understood at the time by the broad masses, the more magnificent will be our 
success. 


446 


That is the lesson which history teaches, and the achievement will be all 
the more significant, 1f the end 1s conceived in the right way and the fight 
carried through with unswerving persistence. 


Many of the officials who direct the affairs of State nowadays may find it 
easier to work for the maintenance of the present order than to fight for a new 
one. 


They will find it more comfortable to look upon the State as a 
mechanism, whose purpose is its own preservation, and to say that ‘their lives 
belong to the State,’ as if anything that grew from the inner life of the nation can 
logically serve anything but the national life, and as if man could have any finer 
task than to serve his fellow beings. 


Naturally, it is easier, as I have said, to consider the authority of the State 
as nothing but the formal mechanism of an organisation, rather than as the 
sovereign incarnation of a people’s instinct for self-preservation on this earth. 


For these weak minds the State (and the authority of the State) is nothing 
but an aim in itself, while for us it is an effective weapon in the great and 
eternal struggle for existence, a weapon to which everyone must yield, not 
because it is a mere formal mechanism, but because it is the main expression of 
our common will to exist. 


Therefore, in the fight for our new idea, which conforms completely to 
the primal meaning of life, we shall find only a small number of comrades ina 
social order which has become decrepit not only physically, but mentally. 


From these circles only a few exceptional people will join our ranks, 
only those few old people whose hearts have remained young and whose 
courage 1s still vigorous, but not those who consider it their duty to maintain 
the status quo. 


Against us we have the innumerable army of all those who are lazy- 
minded and indifferent rather than evil, and those whose self-interest leads 
them to uphold the present state of affairs. 


In the apparent hopelessness of our great struggle lie the magnitude of 
our task and the possibilities of success. A battle-cry, which from the very start 
will scare off all the petty spirits, or at least discourage them, will become a 
rallying signal for all those that are of the real fighting mettle. Moreover, it 
must be clearly recognised that if a highly energetic and active body of men 


447 


emerges from a nation and unites in the fight for one goal, thereby ultimately 
rising above the inert masses of the people, this small percentage will become 
masters of the whole. 


World history is made by minorities, if these numerical minorities 
possess in themselves the will, energy and initiative of the majority. 


What seems an obstacle to many persons is really a preliminary 
condition of our victory. Just because our task is so great and because so many 
difficulties have to be overcome, the probability is that only the best kind of 
protagonist will join our ranks. 


This selection is the guarantee of our success. Nature generally takes 
certain measures to correct the effect which racial inter-breeding produces. 
She 1s not much in favour of the mongrel. The earlier products of inter- 
breeding have to suffer bitterly, especially the third, fourth and fifth 
generations. 


Not only are they deprived of the higher qualities that belonged to the 
parents who participated in the first crossing, but they also lack definite will- 


power and vigorous vital energies, owing to the lack of harmony in the quality 
of their blood. 


At all critical moments in which a person of pure racial blood makes 
correct decisions, that is to say, decisions that are coherent and uniform, the 
person of mixed blood will become confused and take half-measures. 


Hence we see that a person of mixed blood 1s not only relatively inferior 
to a person of pure blood, but is also doomed to become extinct more rapidly. 


In innumerable cases where the pure race holds its ground, the mongrel 
breaks down. Therein we see the corrective measures adopted by Nature; she 
restricts the possibilities of procreation, thus impeding the fertility of cross- 
breeds and dooming them to extinction. 


For instance, if an individual member of a race should mingle his blood 
with the member of a superior race, the first result would be a lowering of the 
racial level, and furthermore, the issue of this mixed marriage would be 
weaker than those of the people around them who had maintained their blood 
unadulterated. 


Where no new blood from the superior race enters the racial stream of 


448 


the mongrels, and where these mongrels continue to cross-breed among 
themselves, the latter will either die out because they have insufficient powers 
of resistance, which is Nature’s wise provision, or in the course of many 
thousands of years they will forma new mongrel race in which the original 
elements will become so wholly mixed through this millennial crossing that 
traces of the original elements will be no longer recognizable. 


In this way, a new people would be evolved possessing a certain 
resistance capacity of the herd type; but its, intellectual value and its cultural 
significance would be essentially inferior to those of the superior race 
participating in the original inter-breeding. 


But even in this last case, the mongrel product would succumb in the 
mutual struggle for existence with a higher racial group that had maintained its 
blood unmixed. 


The herd solidarity which this mongrel race had developed in the course 
of thousands of years would not be equal to the struggle, and this is because it 
would lack elasticity and constructive capacity to prevail over a race of 
homogeneous blood that was mentally and culturally superior. 


Hence, we may lay down the following principle as well-founded. Every 
racial mixture leads of necessity sooner or later to the downfall of the mongrel 
product, as long as a section of the superior race participating in the cross- 
breeding remains intact and preserves some sort of racial homogeneity. 


The threat to the mongrels ceases only with the bastardization of the last 
members of the superior race who are of unmixed blood. 


This principle is the source of a slow but constant regeneration whereby 
all the poison which has invaded the racial body is gradually eliminated as 
long as there remains a fundamental stock of pure racial elements and there is 
no further inter-breeding. 


Such a process may set in automatically among those people where a 
strong racial instinct has remained. Among such people we may count those 
elements which, for some particular cause such as coercion, have been thrown 
out of the normal way of reproduction along strict racial lines. 


As soon as this compulsion ceases, that part of the race which has 
remained intact will tend to marry with its own kind and thus impede further 
intermingling. 


449 


Then the mongrels recede quite naturally into the background unless their 
numbers have increased so much as to be able to withstand all serious 
resistance from those elements which have preserved the purity of their race. 


When men have lost their natural instincts and ignore the obligations 
imposed on them by Nature, then there is no hope that Nature will repair the 
damage that has been caused, until recognition of their own obligations has 
replaced their lost instincts. 


Then the task of making good what has been lost will have to be 
accomplished by Nature. But there is a serious danger that those who have 
once become blind in this respect will continue more aid more to break down 
racial barriers and finally lose the last remnants of what is best in them. 


What then remains is nothing but a uniform pulpy mass, which seems to 
be the dream of our fine Utopians, but that pulpy mass would soon banish all 
ideals from the world. Certainly a great herd could thus be formed. 


One can breed a herd of animals, but from a mixture of this kind, men 
such as have created and founded civilisations would not be produced. The 
mission of humanity might then be considered at an end. 


Those who do not wish that the earth should fall into such a condition 
must realise that it is the task of the Germanic States in particular to see to it 
that the process of bastardization is brought to a stop. 


Our contemporary generation of weaklings will naturally decry sucha 
policy and whine and complain about it as an encroachment on the most sacred 
of human rights. 


But there is only one right that 1s sacrosanct and that right is at the same 
time a most sacred duty, namely, to protect racial purity so that the best types of 
human beings may be preserved and thus render possible a more noble 
development of humanity itself. 


A volkisch State ought, in the first place, to raise matrimony above the 
level of continual racial adulteration. The State should consecrate it as an 
institution for the procreation of creatures made in the likeness of God Himself 
and not of monsters that are a mixture of man and ape. 


The protest which is put forward in the name of humanity does not befit 
the mouth of a generation that makes it possible for the most depraved 


450 


degenerates to propagate their kind, thereby imposing unspeakable suffering on 
their own products and on their contemporaries, while, on the other hand, 
contraceptives, are permitted and sold in every drug store and even by street 
hawkers, so that babies should not be born to the healthiest of our people. 


In this present State of ours, whose function it is to be the guardian of 
law and order, our national bourgeoisie looks upon it as a crime to make 
procreation impossible for syphilitics and those who suffer from tuberculosis 
or hereditary diseases, and also for cripples and imbeciles. 


But the practical prevention of procreation among millions of our very 
best people is not considered an evil, nor does it offend against the moral code 
of this hypocritical class, but rather suits their short-sightedness and mental 
lethargy, for otherwise they would have to rack their brains to find an answer 
to the question of how to create conditions for the feeding and maintaining of 
those yet unborn beings who will be the healthy representatives of our nation 
and will, in their turn, have to perform the same task for the generation that is 
to follow them. 


How devoid of ideals and how ignoble is the whole contemporary 
system! No effort is being made to perfect the breed for the future, but things 
are simply allowed to slide. 


The fact that the churches join in condoning this sin against the image of 
God, even though they continue to emphasise the dignity of that image, 1s quite 
in keeping with their present activities. 


They talk about the Spirit, but they allow man, as the embodiment of the 
Spirit, to degenerate to the proletarian level. Then they gape with amazement 
when they realise how small is the influence of the Christian Faith in their own 
country and how depraved and ungodly 1s this riff-raff which is physically 
degenerate and therefore morally degenerate also. To balance this state of 
affairs they try to convert the Hottentots, the Zulus and the Kaffirs and to 
bestow on them the blessings of the Church. 


While our European people, God be praised and thanked, are left to 
become the victims of moral depravity, the pious missionary goes out to 
Central Africa and establishes mission-stations for Negroes. 


Finally, sound and healthy though primitive and backward people will be 
transformed, in the name of our ‘higher civilisation,’ into a motley of lazy and 


451 


brutalized mongrels. 


It would better accord with noble human aspirations if our two Christian 
denominations would cease to bother the Negroes with their preaching, which 
the Negroes do not want and do not understand. 


It would be better if they left this work alone and if, in its stead, they 
tried to teach people in Europe, kindly and seriously, that it is much more 
pleasing to God if a couple that is not of healthy stock were to show loving- 
kindness to some poor orphan and become a father and mother to him, rather 
than give life to a sickly child that will be a cause of suffering and unhappiness 
to all. 


In this field the volkisch State will have to repair the damage that has 
been caused by the fact that the problem 1s at present neglected by all the 
various parties concerned. 


It will be the task of the volkisch State to make the race the nucleus of the 
life of the community. It must make sure that the purity of the racial strain will 
be preserved. 


It must proclaim the truth that the child is the most valuable possession a 
nation can have. 


It must see to it that only those who are healthy beget children; that there 
is only one infamy, namely, for parents that are ill or show hereditary defects to 
bring children into the world and that in such cases it is a matter of honour to 
refrain from doing so. 


But, on the other hand, it must be considered as reprehensible to refrain 
from giving healthy children to the nation. 


In this matter, the State must assert itself as the trustee of a millennial 
future, in the face of which the egotistic desires of the individual count for 
nothing and will have to give way before the ruling of the State. 


In order to fulfil this duty in a practical manner the State will have to 
avail itself of modem medical discoveries. It must proclaim as unfit for 
procreation all those who are afflicted with some identifiable hereditary 
disease or are the carriers of it, and practical measures must be adopted to 
have such people rendered sterile. 


452 


On the other hand, provision must be made for the normally fertile 
woman so that she will not be restricted in child-bearing through the financial 
and economic conditions obtaining under a regime which makes the having of 
children a curse to parents. 


The State will have to abolish the cowardly and even criminal 
indifference with which the problem of social amenities for large families is 
treated, and it will have to be the supreme protector of this greatest blessing of 
which a people can boast. 


Its attention and care must be directed towards the child rather than the 
adult. 


Those who are physically or mentally unhealthy and unfit must not 
perpetuate their own suffering in the bodies of their children. 


From the educational point of view there is here a huge task for the 
volkisch State to accomplish, but in a future era this work will appear greater 
and more significant than the victorious wars of our present bourgeois epoch. 


Through education the State must teach individuals that illness is not a 
disgrace, but an unfortunate accident which is to be pitied, yet that it is a crime 
and a disgrace to make this affliction worse by passing on disease and defects 
to innocent creatures, out of mere egotism. 


The State must also teach the people that it is an expression of a really 
noble nature and that it is a humanitarian act worthy of admiration if a person 
who innocently suffers from hereditary disease refrains from having a child of 
his own, but gives his love and affection to some unknown child who, through 
its health, promises to become a healthy member of a healthy community. 


In accomplishing such an educational task the State integrates its 
practical function by this activity in the moral sphere. It must act on this 
principle without paying any attention to the question of whether its conduct 
will be understood or misconstrued, blamed or praised. 


If, throughout a period of not more than six hundred years, all physically 
degenerate or mentally defective persons were sterilized, humanity would not 
only be delivered from an immense misfortune, but also restored to a state of 
general health such as we at present can hardly imagine. 


If the fecundity of the healthy portion of the nation were encouraged ina 


453 


conscientious and methodical way, we should have at least the beginnings of a 
race from which all those germs would be eliminated which are to-day the 
cause of our moral and physical decadence, 


If a people and a State take this course to develop that nucleus of the 
nation which is most valuable from the racial standpoint and thus increase its 
fecundity, the people as a whole will subsequently enjoy the blessings which 
go with pure breeding. 


To achieve this, the State should first of all not leave the colonisation of 
newly acquired territory to a haphazard policy, but should have it carried out 
in accordance with definite principles. 


Specially competent committees ought to issue certificates to individuals 
entitling them to engage in colonisation work, and these certificates should 
guarantee the racial purity of the individuals in question. 


In this way frontier colonies could gradually be founded whose 
inhabitants would be of the purest racial stock, and hence would possess the 
best qualities of the race. 


Such colonies would be a valuable asset to the whole nation. Their 
development would be a source of joy, confidence and pride to each citizen of 
the nation, because they would contain the nucleus which would ultimately 
bring about a great development of the nation and indeed of mankind itself. 


The Weltanschauung which bases the State on the racial idea must 
finally succeed in bringing about a nobler era, in which men will no longer pay 
exclusive attention to breeding and rearing pedigree dogs, horses and cats, but 
will endeavour to improve the breed of the human race itself, 


That will be an era of self-restraint and renunciation for one class of 
people, while the others will give their gifts and make their sacrifices joyfully. 


That such a mentality may be possible cannot be denied in a world 
where hundreds and thousands accept the principle of celibacy of their own 
free will, without being obliged or pledged to do so by anything except an 
ecclesiastical precept. 


Why should it not be possible to induce people to make this sacrifice 1f, 
instead of such a precept, they were simply told that they ought to put an end to 
the original sin of racial corruption which ts steadily being committed from 


454 


one generation to another. Further, they ought to be made to realise that it 1s 
their bounden duty to give to the Almighty Creator beings such as He Himself 
made in His own image. 


Naturally, our wretched army of contemporary Philistines will not 
understand these things. They will ridicule them or shrug their round shoulders 
and groan out their everlasting excuses, “Of course, it is a fine thing, but the 
pity is that it cannot be carried out.” 


And we reply, “With you indeed it cannot be done, for your world 1s 
incapable of such an idea. You know only one anxiety and that is for your own 
personal existence. You have but one God, and that is your money. 


“We do not turn to you, however, for help, but to the great army of those 
who are too poor to consider their personal existence as the highest good on 
earth. They do not place their trust in money, but in other gods, into whose 
hands they confide their lives. 


“Above all we turn to the vast army of our German youth. They are 
coming to maturity in a great epoch, and they will fight against the evils which 
were the outcome of the laziness and indifference of their fathers.” 


Either the German youth will one day create a new State founded on the 
racial idea or they will be the last witnesses of the complete breakdown and 
death of the bourgeois world. Ifa generation suffers from defects which it 
recognises and even admits and is nevertheless quite pleased with itself, as the 
bourgeois world is to-day, resorting to the cheap excuse that nothing can be 
done to remedy the situation, then such a generation is doomed to disaster. 


A marked characteristic of our bourgeois world is that it can no longer 
deny the evil conditions that exist. It has to admit that there is much which is 
foul and wrong; but it is unable to make up its mind to fight against that evil, 
which would mean putting forth the energy to mobilise the forces of sixty or 
seventy million people and thus oppose the menace. 


The bourgeois classes do just the opposite. When such an effort is made 
elsewhere they only indulge in silly comment and try froma safe distance to 
show that such an enterprise is theoretically impossible and doomed to failure. 


No arguments are too stupid to be employed in defence of their own 
pettifogging opinions and their moral attitude. If, for instance, a whole 
continent wages war against alcoholic poisoning, so as to free an entire people 


455 


from this devastating vice, the only reaction of our European bourgeois is to 
gape, shake his head and ridicule the movement with a superior sneer—a state 
of mind which is particularly effective in a society that is so ridiculous. 


But if all this proves of no avail and in some corner of the world the 
time-honoured, inviolable routine is attacked, and attacked to some effect, then 
as has been said, at least the effect must be belittled, even if bourgeois moral 
principles have to be invoked against a movement, the object of which is to 
suppress a great moral evil. 


We must not permit ourselves any illusions on this point. The 
contemporary bourgeois world has become unfit to perform any such noble 
task for the sake of humanity, simply because it is of inferior quality and at the 
same time evil, not so much because it is bent on evil, but because of an all- 
pervading indolence and its consequences. 


That is why those political societies which call themselves bourgeois 
parties are nothing but associations to promote the interests of certain 
professional groups and classes: Their highest aim is to defend their own 
egotistic interests as best they can. 


It is obvious that such a guild, consisting of bourgeois politicians, may 
be considered fit for anything rather than a struggle, especially when the 
adversaries are not cautious shopkeepers but the proletarian masses, goaded to 
extremity and out to win at any cost. 


If we consider it the first duty of the State to serve and promote the 
general welfare of the people, by preserving and encouraging the development 
of the best racial elements, the logical consequence is that this task cannot be 
limited to measures concerning the birth of the infant members of the race and 
nation, but that the State will also have to adopt educational means for making 
each citizen a worthy factor in the further propagation of the race. 


Just as, in general, racial quality is the preliminary condition for the 
mental efficiency of any given human material, the training, of the individual 
will first of all have to be directed towards the development of sound bodily 
health, for the general rule is that a strong and healthy mind is found only ina 
strong and healthy body. 


The fact that men of genius are sometimes not robust in health and 
stature, and are even of a sickly constitution, is no proof of the falsity of the 


456 


principle I have enunciated. 


These cases are only exceptions which, as everywhere else, prove the 
rule. But when the bulk of a nation is composed of physical degenerates it is 
rare for a great man to arise from such a miserable motley, and in any case his 
activities would never meet with great success. 


A degenerate mob will either be incapable of understanding him at all or 
their will-power will be so feeble that they cannot follow the soaring flight of 
such an eagle. 


The State that is grounded on the racial principle and is alive to the 
significance of this truth will first of all have to base its educational work not 
on the mere imparting of knowledge, but rather on physical training and the 
development of healthy bodies. 


The cultivation of the intellectual faculties occupies only second place, 
and here again it is character which has to be developed first of all, namely, 
strength of will and the ability to make decisions. 


The educational system ought to foster a spirit of readiness to accept 
responsibilities gladly. Formal instruction in the sciences must be considered 
last in importance. 


Accordingly, the State which is grounded on the racial idea must start 
with the principle that a person whose formal education in the sciences is 
relatively small, but who is physically sound and robust, of a steadfast and 
honest character, ready and able to make decisions and endowed with strength 
of will, is a more useful member of the national community than a weakling 
who is scholarly and refined. 


A nation composed of learned men who are physically degenerate, or 
weak-willed and timid pacifists, is not capable of ensuring even its own 
existence on this earth. 


In the bitter struggle which decides the destiny of man, it is very rare that 
an individual has succumbed because he lacked learning. Those who fail are 
they who try to ignore these consequences and are too faint-hearted to put them 
into effect. 


There must be a certain balance between mind and body. A degenerate 
body is not more beautiful because it houses a radiant spirit. 


457 


We should not be acting justly if we were to bestow the highest 
intellectual training on those who are physically deformed and crippled, who 
lack decision and are weak-willed and cowardly. 


What has made the Greek ideal of beauty immortal is the wonderful 
union of splendid physical beauty with nobility of mind and spirit. 


Moltke’s saying, that, in the long run, fortune favours only the efficient, 
certainly holds good for the relationship between body and spirit. 


A mind which 1s sound generally dwells in a body that is sound. 


Accordingly, in the volkisch State physical training is not a matter for the 
individual alone, nor is it a duty which first devolves on the parents and is only 
secondarily a matter of public interest. 


It is necessary for the preservation of the people, who are represented 
and protected by the State. 


As regards purely formal education the State even now interferes with 
the individual’s right of self-determination and insists upon the right of the 
community by subjecting the child to an obligatory system of training, without 
regard to the views of the parents. 


In a similar way and to a higher degree the new volkisch State will one 
day make its authority prevail, over the ignorance and incomprehension of 
individuals in problems appertaining to the safety of the nation. 


It must organise its educational work in such a way that the bodies of the 
young will lie systematically trained from infancy onwards, so as to be 
tempered and hardened for the demands to be made on them in later years. 
Above all, the State must see to it that a generation of book-worms 1s not 
developed. 


The work of education and hygiene has to begin with the young mother. 
Painstaking efforts carried on for several decades have succeeded in 
abolishing septic infection in childbirth and in reducing puerperal fever to a 
relatively small number of cases. 


It ought to be possible to give nurses and mothers a thorough course of 
instruction and to institute a system of training the child from early infancy 
onwards which may serve as an excellent basis for its future development. 


458 


The volkisch State ought to allow much more time for physical training 
in schools. 


It is nonsense to burden young brains with a load of material of which, as 
experience shows, they retain only a small part, and mostly not the essentials, 
but only what is of secondary importance, because the young mind 1s incapable 
of sifting the right kind of learning from among all that 1s crammed into it. 


To-day, even in the curriculum of the high schools, only two short hours 
in the week are reserved for gymnastics; and, worse still, it is left to the pupils 
to decide whether or not they want to take part. 


This shows a grave disproportion between this branch of education and 
purely intellectual instruction. Not a single day should be allowed to pass on 
which the young pupil does not have one hour of physical training in the 
morning and one in the evening, and every sort of sport and gymnastics should 
be included. 


There is one kind of sport which should be especially encouraged, 
although many people who call themselves volkisch consider it brutal and 
vulgar, namely, boxing. It is incredible how many false notions prevail among 
the ‘cultured’ classes. 


The fact that the young man learns, how to fence and then spends his time 
in duelling is considered quite natural and respectable. But boxing—that is 
brutal! Why? There is no other sport which equals this in developing the 
militant spirit, none that demands such a power of rapid decision or gives the 
body the flexibility of fine steel. 


It is no more vulgar for two young people to settle their differences with 
their fists rather than with sharp-pointed pieces of steel. 


One who is attacked and defends himself with his fists surely does not 
act in less manly a fashion than one who runs off and yells for the assistance of 
a policeman. 


But, above all, a healthy youth has to learn to endure hard knocks. This 
principle may appear savage to our contemporary champions who fight only 
with the weapons of the intellect, but it is not the purpose of the vo/kisch State 
to raise a colony of aesthetic pacifists and physical degenerates. 


This State does not consider that the human ideal is to be found in the 


459 


honourable Philistine or the maidenly spinster, but in a bold prototype of manly 
virtues and in women capable of bringing men into the world. 


Generally speaking, the function of sport is not only to make the 
individual strong, alert and daring, but also to harden the body and train it to 
endure adverse conditions. 


If our intellectual upper classes had not been trained exclusively in the 
art of gentlemanly behaviour and if, on the contrary, they had learned boxing, it 
would never have been possible for bullies, deserters and other such canaille 
to carry through a German revolution. For the success of this revolution was 
not due to the courageous, energetic and audacious activities of its authors, but 
to the lamentable cowardice and irresolution of those who ruled the German 
State at that time and were responsible for it. 


Our educated leaders had received only an ‘intellectual’ training and 
therefore found themselves defenceless when their adversaries used crowbars 
instead of intellectual weapons. 


All this could happen only because our superior scholastic system did 
not train men to be real men, but merely to be civil servants, engineers, 
technicians, chemists, litterateurs, jurists and, finally, professors, lest 
intellectualism die out. Our leaders in the purely intellectual sphere have 
always been brilliant, but when it came to taking resolute action in practical 
affairs our leaders have been beneath criticism. 


Of course, education cannot make a courageous man out of one who is 
temperamentally a coward, but a man who naturally possesses a certain degree 
of courage will not be able to develop that quality if his defective education 
has made him inferior to others from the very start as regards physical strength 
and prowess. 


The Army offers the best example of the fact that the knowledge of his 
physical ability develops a man’s courage and militant spirit. Outstanding 
heroes were not the rule in the Army, but men of average courage. 


The excellent schooling which the German soldier received before the 
War imbued the members of the whole gigantic organism with a degree of 
confidence in their own superiority such as even our opponents never thought 
possible. 


All the immortal examples of dauntless courage and daring which the 


460 


German armies gave during the late summer and autumn of 1914, as they 
advanced from triumph to triumph, were the result of that training which had 
been pursued systematically. 


During the long years of peace before the last war men who were almost 
physical weaklings were made capable of incredible deeds, and thus a self- 
confidence was developed which did not fail them even in the most terrible 
battles. It is our German people, which is now ina state of collapse and 
helpless to defend itself against the kicks dealt it by the rest of the world, that 
has need of the power that is the outcome of self-confidence. 


But this confidence in oneself must be instilled into our children from 
their very early years. The whole system of education and training must be 
directed towards fostering in the child the conviction that he is unquestionably 
a match for anybody and everybody. 


The individual has to regain his own physical strength and prowess in 
order to believe in the invincibility of the nation to which he belongs. 


What has formerly led the German armies to victory was the sum total of 
the confidence which each individual had in himself, and which all of them had 
in their leaders. 


What will restore the national strength of the German people is the 
conviction that they will be able to regain their liberty, but this conviction can 
only be the final product of this same feeling in millions of individuals. 


And here again we must have no illusions. The collapse of our people 
was overwhelming, and the efforts who put an end to so much misery must be 
superhuman. It would be a bitter and grave error to believe that our people 
could be made strong again simply by means of our present bourgeois training 
in good order and obedience. 


That will not suffice if we are to break up the present order of things, 
which now sanctions the acknowledgment of our defeat, and cast the broken 
chains of our slavery in the faces of our opponents. 


Only by a superabundance of national energy and a passionate this it for 
liberty can we recover what has been lost. 


Again, the manner of clothing the young should be such as harmonises 
with this purpose. It is really lamentable to see how our young people have 


461 


fallen victims to a fashion mania which perverts the meaning of the old adage 
that clothes make the man. 


Especially in regard to young people, clothes should have their place in 
educational training. The boy who walks about in summer-time wearing long 
baggy trousers and clad up to the neck is hampered by his clothes from feeling 
any inclination towards strenuous physical exercise. 


Ambition and, to speak quite frankly, even vanity must be appealed to. I 
do not mean such vanity as leads people to want to wear fine clothes, which 
not everybody can afford, but rather the vanity which makes a person want to 
develop a fine physique which everybody can try to do. 


This is also of value in later years. The young girl must get to know her 
mate. If the beauty of the body were not completely forced into the background 
to-day through our stupid manner of dressing, it would not be possible for 
thousands of our girls to be led astray by Jewish mongrels, with their repulsive 
crooked waddle. 


It is also in the interests of the nation that those of beautiful physique 
should mate in order that they may play their part in providing the nation with 
fresh beauty. 


Since we have at present no form of military training and since, 
consequently, the only institution which, in peacetime at least, partly made up 
for the lack of physical training in our education is now lacking, what I have 
suggested is all the more necessary in our time. 


The success of our old military training not only showed itself in the 
education of the individual, but also in the influence which it exercised over 
the mutual relationship between the sexes. The young girl preferred the soldier 
to one who was not a soldier. 


The volkisch State must not confine its control of physical training to the 
official school period, but must demand that, after leaving school, and while 
his adolescent body is still developing, the boy continues this training, for on 
such proper physical development, success in after-life largely depends. 


It is stupid to think that the right of the State to supervise the education of 
its young citizens suddenly comes to an end the moment they leave school and 
recommences only with military service. 


462 


This right is a duty, and as such it must continue uninterruptedly. The 
present State, which does not interest itself in developing healthy men, has 
criminally neglected its duty. It leaves our contemporary youth to be, corrupted 
on the streets and in the brothels, instead of keeping hold of the reins and 
continuing the physical training of these young people up to the time when they 
are grown into healthy young men and women. 


For the present, it is a matter of indifference what form the State chooses 
for carrying on this training. The essential thing is that it should be developed 
and that the most suitable ways of doing so should be investigated. 


The volkisch State will have to consider the physical training of the 
youth after the school period just as much a public duty as his intellectual 
training, and this training will have to be carried out through public 
institutions. 

On general lines it can be a preparation for subsequent service in the 
Army, and then it will no longer be the task of the Army to teach the young 
recruit the most elementary drill regulations. 


In fact, the Army will no longer have to deal with recruits in the present 
sense of the word, but will rather have to transform into a soldier the youth 
whose bodily prowess has already been fully developed. 


In the volkisch State the Army will no longer be obliged to teach boys 
how to walk and stand erect, but it will be the final and supreme school of 
patriotic education. 


In the Army the young recruit will learn the art of bearing arms and .at 
the same time he will be equipped for his other duties in later life. 


The supreme aim of military education must always be to achieve that 
which was attributed to the old Army as its highest merit, namely, that through 
his military schooling the boy must be transformed into a man, that he must not 
only learn to obey, but also acquire the fundamentals that will enable him one 
day to command. He must learn to remain silent, not only when he is justly 
rebuked, but also when he 1s unjustly rebuked. 


Furthermore, in the consciousness of his own strength and on the basis of 
that esprit de corps which inspires him and his comrades, he must become 
convinced that he belongs to a nation which is invincible. 


463 


After he has completed his military training two certificates shall be 
handed to the soldier. The one will be his diploma as a citizen of the State, a 
juridical document which will enable him to take part in public affairs. 


The second will be an attestation of his physical health, which 
guarantees his fitness for marriage. 


The volkisch State will have to direct the education of girls just as that 
of boys and according to the same fundamental principles. 


Here again, special importance must be assigned to physical training, 
and only after that must the importance of spiritual and mental training be taken 
into account. 


In the education of the girl the final goal always to be kept in mind is that 
she is one day to be a mother. 


In the second place, the volkisch State must busy itself with the all-round 
training of character. 


Of course, the essential traits of the individual character are already 
there before any education takes place. 


A person who 1s fundamentally egotistic will always remain 
fundamentally egotistic, and the idealist will always remain fundamentally an 
idealist. 


Besides those, however, who already possess a definite stamp of 
character there are millions of people with characters that are indefinite and 


vague. 


The born delinquent will always remain a delinquent, but numerous 
people who show only a certain tendency to commit criminal acts may become 
useful members of the community if rightly trained; whereas, on the other hand, 
weak and unstable characters may easily become evil elements if the system of 
education is bad. 


During the War it was often lamented that our people could be so little 
reticent. This failing made it very difficult to keep even highly important 
secrets from the knowledge of the enemy. 


But let us put the question: What did the German educational system do 
in pre-war times to teach Germans to be discreet? 


464 


Did it not very often happen in school-days that the little tell-tale was 
preferred to his companions who kept their mouths shut? 


Is it not true that then, as well as now, complaining about others was 
considered praiseworthy ‘candour,’ while silent discretion was taken as 
obstinacy? 


Has any attempt ever been made to teach the young that discretion is a 
precious and manly virtue? No, for such matters are trifles in the eyes of our 
education authorities. 


But these trifles cost our State innumerable millions in legal expenses, 
for ninety per cent of all the processes for defamation and similar charges arise 
only from a lack of discretion. 


Remarks that are made without any sense of responsibility are 
thoughtlessly repeated from mouth to mouth, and our economic welfare is 
continually damaged because important methods of production are carelessly 
disclosed. 


Secret preparations for our national defence are rendered illusory 
because our people have never learned the duty of silence. They repeat 
everything they happen to hear. In time of war such talkative habits may even 
cause the loss of battles and may therefore contribute essentially for the 
unsuccessful outcome of a campaign. 


Here, as in other matters, we may rest assured that adults cannot do what 
they have not learnt to do in youth. A teacher must not try to discover the wild 
tricks of the boys by encouraging the evil practice of tale-bearing. 


Young people form a sort of state among themselves and face adults with 
a certain solidarity. That is quite natural. The ties which unite the ten-year-old 
boys to one another are stronger and more natural than their relationship to 
adults. 


A boy who tells on his comrades commits an act of treason and shows a 
bent of character which is, to speak bluntly, similar to that of a man who 
commit; high treason. 


Such a boy must not be classed as ‘good,’ ‘reliable,’ and so on, but rather 
as one with undesirable traits of character. It may be rather convenient for the 
teacher to make use of such unworthy tendencies in order to help him in his 


465 


own work, but by such an attitude the germ of a moral habit is sown in young 
hearts and may one day have fatal consequences. 


It has happened more often than once that a young informer developed 
into a scoundrel. 


This is only one example among many. The deliberate training of fine 
and noble traits of character in our schools to-day is almost negative. 


In the future much more emphasis will have to be laid on this side of our 
educational work. Loyalty, self-sacrifice, and discretion are virtues which a 
great nation must possess, and the teaching and development of these in the 
schools is a more important matter than many other things now included in the 
curriculum. 


To make the children give up habits of complaining, whining and 
howling when they are hurt, etc., also belongs to this part of their training. 


If the educational system fails to teach the child at an early age to endure 
pain and injury without complaining we cannot be surprised, if at a later age, 
when the boy has grown to manhood and is, for example, in the trenches, the 
postal service is used for nothing but to send home letters full of grumbles and 
complaints. 


If our youths, during their years in the primary schools, had had their 
minds crammed with a little less knowledge and if, instead, they had been 
better taught how to be masters of themselves, it would have served us well 
during the years 1915-1918. 


In its educational system the volkisch State will have to attach the highest 
importance to the development of character, hand-in-hand with physical 
training. 


Many more defects which our rational organism betrays at present could 
be ameliorated, if not completely eliminated, by education of the right kind. 


Extreme importance should be attached to the training of will-power and 
young people should be trained to make firm decisions and to accept 
responsibility. 


In the training of our old Army the principle was in vogue that any order 
is always better than no order. Applied to our youth this principle ought to take 


466 


the form that any answer is better than no answer. The fear of replying, because 
one fears to be wrong, ought to be considered more humiliating than giving 
thee wrong reply. On this simple and primitive basis, our youth should be 
trained to have the courage to act. 


It has been often lamented that in November and December 1918 all the 
authorities lost their heads and that, from the monarch down to the last 
divisional commander, nobody had sufficient mettle to make a decision on his 
own responsibility. 


That terrible fact constitutes a grave charge against our educational 
system, because what was revealed ona colossal scale in that moment of 
catastrophe was only what happens on a smaller scale everywhere among us. 


It is the lack of will-power, and not the lack of arms, which renders us 
incapable of offering any serious resistance today. 


This defect is found everywhere among our people and prevents 
decisive action wherever risks have to be taken, as if any great action can be 
taken without involving risk. 


Quite unsuspectingly, a German general found a formula for this 
lamentable lack of the will-to-act when he said, “I act only when I can count on 
a fifty-one per cent chance of success.” 


In that ‘fifty-one per cent chance’ we find the very key to the German 
collapse. The man who demands from Fate a guarantee of his success 
deliberately denies the significance of heroic action, for this significance 
consists in the very fact that, in the definite knowledge that the situation in 
question is fraught with mortal danger, an action is undertaken which may lead 
to success. 


A patient suffering from cancer, who knows that his death is certain if he 
does not undergo an operation, needs no assurance of a fifty-one per cent 
chance of a cure before facing the operation, and if the operation promise only 
a fraction of a one per cent probability of success; a man of courage would risk 
it and he who does not take the risk has no right to whine. 


Taking all in all, cowardly lack of will-power and inability to form 
resolutions are mainly the outcome of the fundamentally wrong training which 
our young people receive. 


467 


The disastrous effects become evident in later life and reach their peak 
in the lack of civilian courage which our leading statesmen display. 


The cowardice which leads nowadays to the shirking of every kind of 
responsibility springs from the same source. Here again it is the fault of the 
education given to our young people. 


This drawback permeates all sections of public life and finds its 
consummation in the institutions of government that function under the 
parliamentary regime. 


Even in the schools, unfortunately, more value is attached to ‘confession 
and full repentance’ and ‘contrite abjuration,’ on the part of little sinners than to 
a simple and frank avowal. But this latter seems to-day, in the eyes of many a 
teacher, to savour of a spirit of utter incorrigibility and depravity, and, though 
it may seem incredible, many a boy 1s told that the gallows is waiting for him, 
because he has shown certain traits which might be of inestimable value to the 
nation its a whole. 


Just as the volkisch State must one day give its attention to training the 
will-power and capacity for decision among the youth, so too it must cultivate 
in the hearts of the younger generation from early childhood onwards a 
readiness to accept responsibility, and the courage to make open and frank 
avowal. 


If it recognises the full significance of this necessity, finally—after a 
century of educative work—it will succeed in building up a nation which will 
no longer be subject to those defects that have contributed so disastrously to 
bring about our present overthrow. 


The formal imparting of knowledge, which constitutes the chief work of 
our educational system to-day, will be taken over by the vélkisch State with 
only few modifications. These modifications must be made in three branches. 


First of all, the brains of young people must not be generally burdened 
with subjects of which ninety-five per cent is useless to them and 1s therefore 
forgotten again. 


The curriculum of the primary and central schools presents an odd 
mixture at the present time. In many branches of study the subject matter to be 
learned has become so enormous that only a very small fraction of it can be 
remembered later on, and indeed only a very small fraction of this whole mass 


468 


of knowledge can be used. 


On the other hand, what is learned is insufficient for anybody who 
wishes to specialise in any certain branch for the purpose of earning his daily 
bread. 


Take, for example, the average civil servant who has passed through the 
Gymnasium or High School, and ask him, at the age of thirty or forty, how much 
he has retained of the knowledge that was crammed into him with so much 
pains. 


How much is retained of all that was stuffed into his brain? He will 
certainly answer, “Well, the sole purpose of all I swotted up in those days was 
not to provide me with a great stock of knowledge from which I could draw in 
later years; but it served to develop the understanding, the memory, and above 
all it helped to strengthen the thinking power of the brain.” 


That is partly true. And yet it is somewhat dangerous to submerge a 
young brain in a flood of impressions, which it can hardly master and the 
single elements of which it cannot discern or appreciate at their true value. 


It is mostly the essential part of this knowledge, and not the incidental, 
that 1s forgotten and sacrificed. 


Thus the principal purpose of this copious instruction is frustrated, for 
that purpose cannot be to make the brain capable of learning by simply offering 
it an enormous and varied amount of subjects for acquisition, but rather to 
furnish the individual with that stock of knowledge, which he will need in later 
life and which he can use for the good of the community. 


This aim, however, is rendered illusory if, because of the 
superabundance of subjects that have been crammed into his head in childhood, 
a person is able to remember nothing, or at least not the essential portion, of all 
this in later life. 


There is no reason why millions of people should learn two or three 
languages during their school years, when only a very small fraction will have 
the opportunity to use these languages in later life and when most of them will 
therefore forget these languages completely. 


To take one instance, out of one hundred thousand students who learn 
French there are probably not two thousand who will be ina position to make 


469 


use of this accomplishment in later life, while ninety-eight thousand will never 
have a chance to utilise in practice what they have learned in youth. 


They have spent thousands of hours on a subject which will afterwards 
be of no value or importance to them. 


The argument that these, subjects form part of a general education 1s 
invalid. It would be sound if all these people were able to use this learning in 
after-life. But, as matters stand, ninety-eight thousand are tortured to no 
purpose and waste valuable time, for the sake of the two thousand to whom the 
language will be of any use. 


In the case of that language which I have chosen as an example it cannot 
be said that the learning of it educates the student in logical thinking or 
sharpens his mental acumen, as the learning of Latin, for instance, might be 
said to do. 


It would, therefore, be much better to teach young students only the 
general outline or, better, the inner structure of such a language, that is to say, to 
allow them to discern the characteristic features of the language, or perhaps to 
make them acquainted with the rudiments of its grammar, its pronunciation, its 
syntax, style, etc. 


That would be sufficient for average students, because it would provide 
a clearer view of the whole and could be more easily remembered and would 
be more practical than the present-day attempt to cram into their heads detailed 
knowledge of the whole language, which they can never master and which they 
will readily forget. 


If this method were adopted, then we should avoid the danger that, out of 
the superabundance of matter taught, only some fragments will remain in the 
memory, for the children would then have to learn what is worth while, and the 
selection between the useful and the useless would thus have been made 
beforehand. 


As regards the majority of students, the knowledge and understanding of 
the rudiments of a language would be quite sufficient for the rest of their lives, 
and those who really do need this language subsequently would thus have a 
foundation on which to build, should they, choose to make a more thorough 
study of it. 


By adopting such a curriculum the necessary amount of time would be 


470 


gained for physical exercises, as well as for a more intense training in the 
various educational fields that have already been mentioned. 


A reform of particular importance is that which ought to take place in the 
present methods of teaching history. Scarcely any other people is made to study 
as much history as the Germans, and scarcely any other people makes such bad 
use of its historical knowledge. 


If politics are history in the making, then our way of teaching history 
stands condemned by the way we have conducted our politics. 


But, there would be no point in bewailing the lamentable results of our 
political conduct, unless we are now determined to give our people a better 
political education. 


In ninety-nine out of one hundred cases the results of our present teaching 
of history are deplorable. Usually only a few dates, years of birth and names, 
remain in the memory, while a knowledge of the main and clearly defined lines 
of historical development is completely lacking. 


The essential features which are of real significance are not taught. It is 
left to the more or less bright intelligence of the individual to discover the 
inner motivating urge amid the mass of dates and chronological succession of 
events. 


You may object as strongly as you like to this unpleasant statement, but 
read with attention the speeches which our parliamentarians make during one 
single session on the problems connected with, let us say, foreign policy. 


Remember that these gentlemen are, or claim to be, the elite of the 
German nation and that at least a great number of them have sat on the benches 
of our secondary schools and that many of them have passed through our 
universities. 


Then you will realise how defective the historical education of these 
men has been. If these gentlemen had never studied history at all, but had 
possessed a sound instinct for public affairs, things would have gone better, 
and the nation would have benefited greatly thereby. 


The subject matter of our history teaching must be curtailed. The chief 
value of that teaching is to make the principal lines of historical development 
understood. The more our historical teaching is limited to this task, the more 


471 


we may hope that it will turn out subsequently to be of advantage to the 
individual and, through the individual, to the community as a whole, for history 
must not be studied merely with a view to knowing what happened in the past, 
but as a guide for the future, and to teach us what policy would be the best to 
follow for the preservation of our own people. 


That is the real end, and the teaching of history is only a means to attain 
this end. But here again the means has superseded the end in our contemporary 
education. The goal is completely forgotten. 


Do not retort that a profound study of history demands a detailed 
knowledge of all these dates because otherwise we could not fix the great lines 
of development. 


That task falls to the professional historians, but the average man is not a 
professor of history. For him history has only one mission, and that is to 
provide him with that amount of historical knowledge which is necessary in 
order to enable him to form an independent opinion on the political affairs of 
his own country. 


The man who wants to become a professor of history can devote himself 
to all the details later on. Naturally he will have to occupy himself even with 
the smallest details. 


Of course our present teaching of history is not adequate to all this, Its 
scope 1s too vast for the average student and too limited for the student who 
wishes to be a historical expert. 


Finally, it is the business of the volkisch State to arrange for the writing 
of a world history in which the racial problem will occupy a dominant 
position. 


To sum up: The vdlkisch State must reconstruct our system of general 
instruction in such a way that it will embrace only what is essential. 


Beyond this it will have to make provision for more advanced teaching 
in the various subjects for those who want to specialise in them. 


It will suffice for the average individual to be acquainted with the 
fundamentals of the various subjects to serve as the basis of what may be 
called an all-round education. 


472 


He ought to study exhaustively and in detail only that subject in which he 
intends to work during the rest of his life. General instruction in all subjects 
should be obligatory, and specialisation should be left to the choice of the 
individual. 


In this way the scholastic programme would be shortened, and thus 
several school hours would be gained which could be utilised for physical 
exercise and character training in will-power, the capacity for making 
practical judgments, decisions, etc. 


The little account taken by our school training to-day, especially in the 
central schools, of the callings that have to be followed in after-life is 
demonstrated by the fact that men who are destined for the same calling in life 
are educated in three different kinds of schools. 


What is of decisive importance is general education and not specialised 
teaching. When special knowledge is needed it cannot be given in the 
curriculum of our central schools as they are to-day. The volkisch State will, 
therefore, one day have to abolish such half-measures. 


The second modification in the curriculum which the vdlkisch State will 
have to make is the following: It is a characteristic of our materialistic epoch 
that our scientific education shows a growing emphasis on what is real and 
practical, on such subjects as, for instance, applied mathematics, physics, 
chemistry, etc. 


Of course, they are necessary in an age that is dominated by industrial 
technology and chemistry, and of which they are, externally at least, a most 
significant factor of everyday life, but it 1s dangerous to base the general 
education of the nation ona knowledge of, these subjects to the exclusion of all 
others. 


General education should, on the contrary, be on cultural lines. It ought to 
be founded more on classical studies and should aim at providing only the 
groundwork for specialised instruction later on in the various practical 
sciences. 


Otherwise we should sacrifice those forces that are more important for 
the preservation of the nation than any technical knowledge. 


In the history department the study of ancient history should not be 
omitted. Roman history, along general lines, 1s, and will remain, the best 


473 


teacher, not only for our own time, but also for the future, and the ideal of 
Hellenic culture should be preserved for us in all its marvellous beauty. 


The differences between the various peoples should not prevent us from 
recognising the community of race which unites them, on a higher plane. 


The conflict of our time is one that is being waged around great 
objectives. A civilisation is fighting for its existence. It is a civilisation that is 
the product of thousands of years of historical development, and the Greek as 
well as the German forms part of it. 


A clear-cut division must be made between general education and 
specialised subjects. Today the latter threaten more and more to become 
debased in the service of Mammon. 


To counterbalance this tendency, general culture should be preserved, at 
least in its ideal forms. The principle should be repeatedly emphasised, that 
industrial and technical progress, trade and commerce, can flourish only as 
long as a folk-community inspired by ideals provides the requisite basis. 


That condition is not created by a spirit of materialistic egotism, but by a 
spirit of self-denial and the joy of giving oneself in the service of others. 


The system of education which obtains to-day sees its principal object in 
cramming into young people that knowledge which wall help them to make 
their way in life. 


This principle is expressed in the following terms, “The young man must 
one day become a useful member of human society.” That phrase refers to his 
ability to gain an honest livelihood. 


The superficial training in the duties of good citizenship, which he 
acquires merely incidentally, has very weak foundations. The State in itself 
represents only a vessel, and therefore it is difficult to train people to look 
upon this vessel as the ideal which they will have to serve and towards which 
they must feel responsible. 


A vessel can be too easily broker. But, as we have seen, people to-day 
have no clear-cut concept of what the term State’ implies. Therefore, there is 
nothing but the usual stereotyped ‘patriotic training. 


In the old Germany this mainly took the form of an adulation (which was 


474 


often rather stupid and usually boring) of petty potentates who were so 
numerous that it became necessary to omit all mention of the really great men 
whom Germany has produced. 


The result was that the broad masses acquired a very inadequate 
knowledge of German history. Here, too, the great lines of development were 
missing. 


It is evident that by such methods no real national enthusiasm could be 
aroused. Our educational system proved incapable of selecting from the 
general mass of our historical personages the names of a few personalities 
which the German people could be proud to look upon as their own. 


Thus the whole nation might have been united by the ties of a common 
knowledge of this common heritage. 


The really important figures in German history were not presented to the 
present generation. The attention of the whole nation was not concentrated on 
them for the purpose of awakening a common national spirit. 


From the various subjects that were taught, those who had charge of our 
training seemed incapable of selecting what redounded most to the national 
honour and of lifting that above the common objective level, in order to 
inflame the national pride in the light of such brilliant examples. 


At that time such a course would have been looked upon as rank 
chauvinism, which did not then have a very pleasant savour. 


Pettifogging dynastic patriotism was more acceptable and more easily 
tolerated than the glowing fire of a supreme national pride. The former could 
always be pressed into service, whereas the latter might one day become a 
dominating force. 


Monarchist patriotism terminated in associations of veterans, whereas 
passionate national patriotism might have opened a road whose goal would 
have been difficult to determine. This national passion is like a thoroughbred 
which will not tolerate any sort of rider in the saddle. 


No wonder that most people preferred to shirk such a danger. Nobody 
seemed to think it possible that one day a war might come which would put the 
mettle of this kind of patriotism to the test, in artillery bombardments and 
waves of attacks with poison gas. 


475 


But when it did come our lack of this patriotic passion was avenged ina 
terrible way. None were very enthusiastic about dying for their imperial and 
royal sovereigns, whilst on the other hand, the ‘nation’ was not recognised by 
the greater number of the soldiers. 


Since the Revolution has taken place in Germany and monarchist 
patriotism has become a thing of the past, the purpose of teaching history has 
merely been to add to the stock of objective knowledge. 


The present State has no use for patriotic enthusiasm, but it will never 
obtain what it really desires, for it dynastic patriotism failed to produce a 
supreme power of resistance at a time when the principle of nationalism 
dominated, it will be still less possible to arouse republican enthusiasm. 


There can be no doubt that the German people would not have stood on 
the field of battle for four and a half years and fought to the battle slogan, ‘For 
the Republic’ least of all those who created this grand institution. 


In reality this Republic has been allowed to exist undisturbed only by 
virtue of its readiness in assuring all and sundry of its willingness to pay 
tribute and reparations to the foreigner and to put its signature to any kind of 
territorial renunciation. 


The rest of the world approves of it, just as a weakling is always more 
pleasing to those who want to bend him to their own will than is a man of 
mettle. But the fact that the enemy like this form of government is the worst 
kind of condemnation. 


They love the German Republic and tolerate its existence because no 
better instrument could be found to help them to keep our people in slavery. It 
is to this fact alone that this magnanimous institution owes its survival. 


That is why it can dispense with, any real system of national education 
and can feel satisfied when the heroes who belong to the Reich Banner 
organisation shout their hurrahs, but in reality these same heroes would 
scamper away like rabbits if called upon to defend that banner with their 
blood. 


The volkisch State will have to fight for its existence. It will neither gain 
nor secure this existence by signing documents like the Dawes Plan, but for its 
existence and defence it will need precisely those things with which our 
present system believes it can dispense. 


476 


The more worthy its form and its inner national character, the greater 
will be the envy and opposition of its adversaries. The best defence will not 
be in the arms it possesses, but in its citizens. 


It is not fortresses that will protect it, but the living wall of its men and 
women, filled with an ardent love for their country and a passionate spirit of 
national patriotism. 


Therefore, the third point which will have to be considered in relation to 
our educational system is the following: The volkisch State must realise that 
the sciences may also be made a means of promoting a spirit of pride in the 
nation. 


Not only the history of the world, but the history of civilisation as a 
whole, must be taught in the light of this principle. An inventor must appear 
great not only as an inventor but also, and even more so, as a member of the 
nation. 


The admiration aroused by the contemplation of a great achievement 
must be, transformed into a feeling of pride and satisfaction that a man of one’s 
own race has been chosen to accomplish it. 


But out of the abundance of great names in German history the greatest 
will have to be selected and presented to our younger generation in such a way 
as to become solid pillars of strength to support the national spirit. 


The subject matter ought to be systematically organised from the 
standpoint of this principle, and the teaching should be so orientated that the 
boy or girl, after leaving school, will not be a semi-pacifist, a democrat or 
something else of that kind, but a whole-hearted German. 


In order that this national feeling be sincere from the very beginning, and 
not a mere pretence, the following fundamental and inflexible principle should 
be impressed on the young brain while it is yet malleable: The man who loves 
his nation can prove the sincerity of this sentiment only by being ready to make 
sacrifices for the nation’s welfare. 


There is no such thing as a national sentiment which is directed towards 
personal interests, and there is no such thing as a nationalism that embraces 
only certain classes. 


Hurrahing proves nothing and does not confer the right to call oneself 


477 


national if behind that shout there is no sincere preoccupation for the 
conservation of the nation’s well-being. 


One can be proud of one’s people only if there is no class left of which 
one need be ashamed. When one half of a nation is sunk in misery and worn cut 
by hardship and distress, or even depraved or degenerate, that nation presents 
such an unattractive picture that nobody can feel proud to belong to it. 


It is only when a nation is sound in all its members, physically and 
morally, that the joy of belonging to it can grow and swell to that supreme 
feeling which we call national pride. 


But this pride, in its highest form, can be felt only by those who know the 
greatness of their nation. 


The spirit of nationalism and a feeling for social justice must be fused 
into one sentiment in the hearts of the youth. Then a day will come when a 
nation of citizens will arise which will be welded together through a common 
love and a common pride that shall be invincible and indestructible for ever. 


The dread of chauvinism, which is a symptom of our time, is a sign of its 
impotence. 


Since our epoch not only lacks everything in the nature of exuberant 
energy, but even finds such a manifestation disagreeable, Fate will never select 
it for the accomplishment of any great deeds. For the greatest changes that have 
taken place on this earth would have been inconceivable if they had not been 
inspired by ardent and even hysterical passions, but only by the bourgeois 
virtues of peacefulness and order. 


One thing is certain, namely, that our world is facing a great revolution. 
The only question is whether the outcome will be propitious for the Aryan 
portion of mankind or whether the everlasting Jew will profit by it. 


By educating the younger generation along the right lines, the volkisch 
State will have to see to it that a generation of men will arise fit to play its part 
in this supreme and final combat that will decide the destiny of the world. 


That nation will conquer which 1s the first to take this road. The whole 
organisation of education and training which the vdlkisch State is to build up 
must regard as its crowning task the work of instilling into the hearts and minds 
of the youth entrusted to it the racial instinct and understanding of the racial 


478 


idea. 


No boy or girl must leave school without having attained a clear insight 
into the meaning of racial purity and the importance of maintaining our racial 
blood unadulterated. 


Thus the first indispensable condition for the preservation of our race 
will have been established and the future cultural progress of our people 
assured, for all physical and mental training would be in vain unless it benefits 
an entity which is ready and determined to carry on its own existence and to 
maintain its own characteristic qualities. 


If it were otherwise, something would result which we Germans have 
cause to regret already, without perhaps having hitherto recognised the extent 
of the tragic calamity. 


Even in future we should be doomed to remain mere manure for 
civilisation, and that not in the banal sense of the contemporary bourgeois 
mind, which sees in a lost fellow-member of our people only a lost citizen, but 
in a sense which we should have to recognise in sorrow, namely, that our, 
racial blood would be destined to disappear. 


By continually mixing with other races we might lift them from their 
former lower level of civilisation to a higher plane, but we ourselves should 
descend for ever from the heights we had reached. 


Finally, from the racial standpoint, this training must also find its 
culmination in military service. The term of military service is to be a final 
stage in the educational training which the average German receives. While the 
volkisch State attaches, the greatest importance to physical and mental training, 
it has also to consider, as no less important, the task of selecting men for the 
service of the state itself. 


This important matter 1s passed over lightly at the present time. 
Generally, the children of parents who are for the time being in higher 
situations are, in their turn, considered worthy of a higher education. 


Here talent plays a subordinate part, but talent can be estimated only 
relatively. Though in general culture he may be inferior to the city child, a 
peasant boy may be more talented than the son of a family that has occupied 
high positions for many generations. 


479 


But the superior culture of the city child has in itself nothing to do witha 
greater or lesser degree of talent, for this culture has its roots in the more 
copious mass of impressions which arise from the more varied education and 
the surroundings among which this child lives. 


If the intelligent son of peasant parents were educated from childhood in 
similar surroundings, his intellectual accomplishments would be quite 
otherwise. 


In our day there is only one sphere where the circumstances in which a 
person has been born mean less than his innate gifts. That is the sphere of art. 
Here, where a person cannot just ‘learn,’ but must have innate gifts that later on 
may undergo a more or less happy development (in the sense of a wise 
development of what is already there), money and parental property are of no 
account. 


This is definite proof that genius 1s not necessarily connected with the 
higher social strata or with wealth. Not rarely the greatest artists come from 
poor families, and many a boy froma country village has eventually become a 
celebrated artist. 


It does not say much for the mental acumen of our time that this truth is 
not recognised and acted upon to the advantage of our whole intellectual life. 


The opinion is advanced that this principle, though undoubtedly valid in 
the field of art, has not the same validity in regard to what are called the 
applied sciences. 


It is true that a man can be trained to a certain amount of mechanical 
dexterity, just as a poodle can be taught incredible tricks by a clever master, 
but such training does not bring the animal to use his intelligence in order to 
carry out those tricks. 


The same holds good in regard to man. It is possible to teach men, 
irrespective of talent, to go through certain scientific exercises, but in such 
cases the results are quite as automatic and mechanical as in the case of the 
animal. 


It would even be possible to force a person of mediocre intelligence, by 
means of an intensive course of intellectual drilling, to acquire more than the 
average amount of knowledge; but that knowledge would remain sterile. 


480 


The result would be a man who might be a walking dictionary of 
knowledge, but who would fail miserably on every critical occasion in life and 
at every juncture where vital decisions had to be taken. 


Such people need to be drilled specially for every new and even most 
insignificant task and will never be capable, of contributing in the least to the 
general progress of mankind. 


Knowledge that is merely drilled into people can at best qualify them to 
fill government positions under our present regime. 


It goes without saying that, among the sum total of individuals who make 
up a nation, gifted people are always to be found in every sphere of life. 


It is also quite natural that the value of knowledge will be the, greater the 
more vitally the dead mass of learning is animated by the innate talent of the 
individual who possesses it. 


Creative work in this field can be done only through the marriage of 
knowledge and talent. 


One example will suffice to show how much our contemporary world is 
at fault in this matter. 


From time to time our illustrated papers publish, for the edification of 
the German Philistine, the news that in some quarter or other of the globe, and 
for the first time in that locality, a Negro has become a lawyer, a teacher, a 
pastor, or even a grand opera singer or something else of that kind. 


While the bourgeois blockhead stares with amazed admiration at the 
paragraph that tells him how marvellous are the achievements of our modern 
educational technique, the more cunning Jew sees in this fact a new proof to be 
utilised for the spreading of the theory with which he wants to infect the public, 
namely, that all men are equal. 


It does not dawn on the murky bourgeois mind that the fact which is 
published for him is a sin against reason itself, that it is an act of criminal 
insanity to train a being who is only an anthropoid by birth until the pretence 
can be made that he has been turned into a lawyer; while, on the other hand, 
millions who belong to the most civilised races have to remain in positions 
which are unworthy of their cultural level. 


481 


The bourgeois mind does not realise that it is a sin against the will of the 
eternal Creator to allow hundreds of thousands of highly gifted people to 
remain floundering in the swamp of proletarian misery, while Hottentots and 
Zulus are drilled to fill positions in the intellectual professions. 


For here we have the product only of a drilling technique, just as in the 
case of the performing dog. If the same amount of care and effort were applied 
among intelligent races, each individual would become a thousand times more 
capable in such matters. This state of affairs would become intolerable ifa day 
should dawn when it is no longer a matter of exceptional cases, but the 
situation is already intolerable where talent and natural gifts are not taken as 
decisive factors in qualifying for the right to a higher education. 


It is indeed intolerable to think that year after year hundreds of thousands 
of young people without a vestige of talent are deemed worthy of a higher 
education, while other hundreds of thousands who possess high natural gifts 
have to go without any sort of higher schooling at all. 


The practical loss thus suffered by the nation is incalculable. If the 
number of important discoveries which have been made in North America, in 
particular, has grown considerably in recent years, one of the reasons is that 
the number of gifted persons belonging to the lowest social classes who were 
given a higher education in that country is proportionately much larger than in 
Europe. 


A stock of knowledge packed into the brain will not suffice for the 
making of discoveries. What counts here is only that knowledge which is 
illuminated by natural talent, but with us at the present time no value is placed 
on such gifts. Only good school reports count. 


Here is another educative work that is waiting for the volkisch State to 
accomplish. It will not be its task to assure a dominant influence to a certain 
social class already existing, but it will be its duty to attract the most 
competent brains in the total mass of the nation and promote them to place and 
honour. 


It is not merely the duty of the State to give to the average child a certain 
amount of education in the primary school, but it is also its duty to make it 
possible for talent to develop, and above all, it must open the doors of the 
colleges and universities to talent of every sort, no matter in what social 
circles it may appear. 


482 


This is an imperative necessity, for thus alone will it be possible to 
develop a talented body of public leaders from among the class which has 
acquired sterile learning. 


There is still another reason why the State should provide for this 
situation. Our intellectual class, particularly in Germany, is so shut up in itself 
and fossilised that it lacks living contact with the classes beneath it. 


Two evil consequences result from this. Firstly, the intellectual class 
neither understands nor sympathises with the broad masses. It has been so long 
cut off from all connection with them that it cannot understand their psychology. 


It has become estranged from the people. Secondly, the intellectual class 
lacks the necessary will-power, for this faculty 1s always weaker in cultivated 
circles, which live in seclusion, than among the primitive masses of the 
people. 


God knows, we Germans have never been lacking in abundant scientific 
culture, but we have always had a considerable lack of will-power and of the 
capacity for making decisions. 


For example, the more ‘intellectual’ our statesmen have been, the more 
lacking they have been, for the most part, in practical achievement. 


Our political preparation and our technical equipment for the World War 
were defective, certainly not because the brains governing the nation were too 
little educated, but because the men who directed our public affairs were over- 
educated, filled to overflowing with knowledge and intelligence, yet without 
any sound instinct and simply without energy, or any spirit of daring. 


It was our nation’s tragedy to have to fight for its existence under a 
Chancellor who was a dilly-dallying philosopher. If, instead of a Bethmann- 
Hollweg, we had had a more robust man of the people as our leader, the heroic 
blood of the common grenadier would not have been shed 1n vain. 


The exaggeratedly intellectual material out of which our leaders were 
made, proved to be the best ally of the scoundrels who carried out the 
November Revolution. 


These intellectuals safeguarded the national wealth in a miserly fashion; 
instead of conscripting it to its limits they created the conditions under which 
others won success. 


483 


Here, the Catholic Church presents an instructive example. Clerical 
celibacy forces the Church to recruit its priests not from their own ranks, but 
progressively from the masses of the people. 


Yet there are not many who recognise the significance of celibacy in this 
relation. Therein lies the cause of the inexhaustible vigour which characterises 
that ancient institution. 


By unceasingly recruiting the ecclesiastical dignitaries from the lower 
classes of the people, the Church is enabled not only to maintain the contact of 
instinctive understanding with the masses of the population, but also to assure 
itself of always being able to draw upon that fund of energy which is present 
only among the lower classes. Hence the surprising youthfulness of that 
gigantic organism, its mental flexibility and its iron resolution. 


It will be the task of the volkisch State so to organise and administer its 
educational system that the existing intellectual-class will be constantly 
furnished with a supply of fresh blood from beneath. 


From the bulk of the nation the State must sift out with careful scrutiny 
those persons who are endowed with natural talents and see to it that they are 
employed in the service of the community, for neither the State itself nor the 
various departments of State exist to furnish revenues for members of a special 
class, but to fulfil the tasks allotted to them. 


This will be possible, however, only if the State trains individuals 
especially for these offices. Such individuals must have the necessary 
fundamental capability and will-power. The principle does not hold good only 
in regard to the, civil service, but also in regard to all those who are to take 
part in the intellectual and moral leadership of the people, no matter in what 
sphere they may be employed. 


The greatness of a people is partly dependent on the condition that it 
must succeed in training the best brains for those branches of the public service 
for which they show a special natural aptitude and in placing them in the 
offices where they can do their best work for the good of the community. 


If two nations of equal strength and quality engage in a mutual conflict, 
that nation will come out victorious which has entrusted its intellectual and 
moral leadership to its best talents and that nation will go under whose 
government represents only a common food trough for privileged groups or 


484 


classes irrespective of the innate talents of its individual members. 


Of course, such a reform seems impossible in the world as it is to-day. 
The objection will at once be raised, that it is too much to expect from the 
favourite son of a highly-placed civil servant, for instance, that he shall work 
with his hands simply because somebody else, whose parents belong to the 
working-class, seems more capable of filling a job in the civil service. 


That argument may be valid as long as manual work is looked upon as it 
is looked upon to-day. Hence the vdlkisch State will have to take up an attitude 
towards the appreciation of manual labour which will be fundamentally 
different from that which now exists. 


If necessary, it will have to organise a persistent system of teaching 
which will aim at abolishing the stupid present-day habit of looking down on 
manual labour as an occupation of which to be ashamed. 


The individual will have to be valued, not by the class of work he does, 
but by the way in which he does it and by its usefulness to the community. 


This statement may sound monstrous in an epoch when the most brainless 
column-writer on a newspaper staff is more esteemed than the most expert 
mechanic, merely because the former pushes a pen. 


But, as I have said, this false valuation does not correspond to the true 
nature of things. It has been artificially introduced, and there was a time when 
it did not exist at all. 


The present unnatural state of affairs is one of those general morbid 
phenomena that have arisen from our materialistic epoch. 


Fundamentally, every kind of work has a double value; the one material, 
the other ideal. The material value depends on the importance of the work in 
the life of the community. 


The greater the number of the population who benefit from the work, 
directly or indirectly, the higher will be its material value. 


This evaluation is expressed in the material recompense which the 
individual receives for his labour. 


In contradiction to this purely material value there 1s the ideal value. 
Here the work performed is not judged by its material importance, but by the 


485 


degree to which it answers a necessity. 


Certainly the material utility of an invention may be greater than that of 
the service rendered by an ordinary workman; but it is also certain that the 
community needs each of those small daily services just as much as the greater 
Services. 


From the material point of view a distinction can be made in the 
evaluation of different kinds of work according to their utility to the 
community, and this; distinction is expressed by differentiation in the scale of 
recompense; but on the ideal or abstract plane all workmen become equal the 
moment each strives to do his best in his own field, no matter what that field 
may be. 


It is on this that a man’s value must be estimated, and not on the amount 
of recompense received. 


Ina sensibly governed State care must be taken that each individual is 
given the kind of work which corresponds to his capabilities. 


In other words, people will be trained for the positions indicated by 
their natural endowments; but these endowments or faculties are innate and 
cannot be acquired by any amount of training, being a gift of Nature and not the 
reward of effort. 


Therefore, the way in which men are generally esteemed by their fellow- 
citizens must not be according to the kind of work they do, because that has 
been more or less assigned to the individual. 


Seeing that the kind of work on which the individual is employed is 
determined by his circumstances and the training which he has, in consequence, 
received from the community. He will have to be judged by the way in which 
he performs the work entrusted to him by the community, for the work which 
the individual performs is not the purpose of his existence, but only a means of 
livelihood. 


His real purpose in life is to better himself and raise himself to a higher 
level as a human being; but this he can only do in and through the community, 
whose cultural life he shares and this community must always exist on the 
foundations of a State. 


He must contribute to the conservation of those foundations. Nature 


486 


determines the form of this contribution. It is the duty of the individual to return 
to the community, zealously and honestly, what the community has given him. 


He who does this deserves the highest respect and esteem. Material 
remuneration may be given to him whose work has a corresponding utility for 
the community; but the ideal recompense must lie in the esteem to which 
everyone has a claim who serves his nation with whatever powers Nature has 
bestowed upon him and which have been developed by the training he has 
received from the national community. Then it will no longer be dishonourable 
to be an honest craftsman, but it will be a source of disgrace to be an 
inefficient State official, wasting God’s day and filching one’s daily bread 
from an honest public. 


Then it will be looked upon as quite natural that positions should not be 
given to persons who, of their very nature, are incapable of filling them. 


Furthermore, this personal efficiency will be the sole criterion of the 
right to take part on an equal juridical footing in general civic affairs. 


The present epoch is working out its own ruin. It introduces universal 
suffrage and chatters about equal rights, but can find no foundation for this 
equality. 


It considers the material wage as the expression of a man’s value and 
thus destroys the basis of the noblest kind of equality that can exist, for equality 
cannot and does not depend on the work a man does, but only on the manner in 
which each one does the particular work allotted to him. 


Thus alone will the mere accident of birth be set aside in determining the 
worth of a man and thus only does the individual become the creator of his 
own social worth. 


At the present time, when whole groups of people estimate each other’s 
value only by the size of the salaries which they respectively receive, there can 
be no understanding of all this, but that is no reason why we should cease to 
champion these ideas. 


On the contrary, in an epoch which 1s inwardly diseased and decaying 
anyone who would heal it must have the courage first to probe to the real roots 
of the disease. 


The National Socialist Movement must take that duty on its shoulders, it 


487 


must act over the heads of the small bourgeoisie and rally together and 
coordinate all those elements within the community which are fit to become the 
protagonists of a new Weltanschauung. 


Of course the objection will be made that in general it is difficult to 
differentiate between the material and ideal values of work and that the lower 
prestige which is attached to manual labour is due to the fact that smaller 
wages are paid for that kind of work. 


It will be said that the lower wage is, in its turn, the reason why the 
manual worker has less chance to participate in the culture of the nation, so that 
the ideal side of human culture is less open to him although it may have nothing 
to do with his daily activities. 


It may be added that reluctance to do physical work 1s justified by the 
fact that, on account of his low wages the cultural level of the manual labourer 
must naturally be low, and that this in turn is a justification for the lower 
estimation in which manual labour is generally held. There is a good deal of 
truth in all this, but that is the very reason why we ought to see that in future 
there should not be such a wide difference in the scale of remuneration. We 
will not entertain the argument that under such condition: poorer work would 
be done. It would be the saddest symptom of decadence if finer intellectual 
work could be obtained only through the stimulus of higher payment. 


If that point of view had ruled the world up to now, humanity would 
never have come into its great scientific and cultural heritage, for the greatest 
inventions, the greatest discoveries, the most profoundly revolutionary 
scientific work, and the most magnificent monuments of human culture, were 
not given to the world from greed of gain. 


On the contrary only too often the fact that they were given to the world 
meant a renunciation of the worldly pleasures that wealth can purchase. 


It may be that money has become the one power that governs life to-day, 
yet a time will come when men will again bow to higher gods. 


Much that we have to-day owes its existence to the desire for money and 
property, but there 1s very little among all this which would leave the world 
poorer by its absence. 


It is also one of the aims of our Movement to hold out the prospect of a 
time when the individual will be given what he needs for the purposes of his 


488 


life and it will be a time in which, on the other hand, the principle will be 
upheld that man does not live for material enjoyment alone. 


This principle will find expression in a wisely limited scale of wages 
and salaries which will enable everyone, including the humblest workman who 
fulfils his duties conscientiously, to live an honourable and decent life both as 
a man and as a citizen. 


Let it not be said that this 1s merely a visionary ideal, that this world 
would never tolerate it in practice and that of itself it is impossible to attain. 


Even we are not so simple as to believe that there will ever be an age in 
which there will be no drawbacks, but that does not release us from the 
obligation to fight for the removal of the defects which we have recognised, to 
overcome the shortcomings and to strive towards the ideal. 


In any case, the hard reality of the facts to be faced will always place 
only too many limits on our aspirations. But that 1s precisely why man must 
strive again and again to serve the ultimate aim. No failures must induce him to 
renounce his intentions, just as we cannot spurn the sway of justice because 
mistakes creep into the administration of the law, and just as we cannot despise 
medical science because, in spite of it, there will always be disease. 


Man should take care not to have too low an estimate of the power of an 
ideal. If there are some who feel disheartened over present conditions, and if 
they happen to have served as soldiers, I would remind them of the time when 
their heroism was the most convincing example of the power inherent in ideal 
motives. It was not preoccupation about their daily bread that led men to 
sacrifice their lives, but love of their country, the faith which they had in its 
greatness, and the common struggle to uphold the honour of the nation. 


Only after the German people had abandoned these ideals in favour of 
the material promises offered by the Revolution, only after they had exchanged 
their arms for the rucksack, only then—instead of entering an earthly paradise 
—did they think into the purgatory of universal contempt and universal want. 


That is why we must confront the calculators of the materialistic 
Republic with faith in an ideal Reich. 


489 


490 


491 
